Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3011.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
POST-SECONDARY STUDENT HEALTH INSURANCE PLAN ACT
16-117-1. Short Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Post-Secondary Student Health
Insurance Plan Act”.
16-117-2. Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall be defined as follows:
(1) “Institution(s) of higher education” means a public or private college or university
located in the State of Rhode Island.
(2) “Student” means any student of an institution of higher education regardless of the
number of credits for which the student is or intends to be enrolled.
16-117-3. Applicability.
This chapter shall apply to all public and private institutions of higher education recognized
by the office of the post-secondary commissioner.
16-117-4. Affirmative plan enrollment required.
(a) No institution of higher education shall automatically enroll any student in a student

health insurance plan. Institutions of higher education shall provide on a tuition bill a prompt for
the student to expressly accept or reject the student health insurance plan. No application for
admission or registration shall be accepted as complete by an institution of higher education unless
and until a student has affirmatively expressly accepted or rejected the student health insurance
plan coverage in writing or by affirmation through an electronic platform.
(b) An institution of higher education shall not assess any fees or premiums for student
health insurance coverage upon any student who has rejected coverage.
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent any institution of higher education
from requiring all students to maintain health insurance coverage as a condition of attending the
institution of higher education.
16-117-5. Recordkeeping.
All institutions of higher education shall maintain records of all student elections to accept
or reject coverage by a student health insurance plan for a minimum of three (3) years.
16-117-6. Enforcement.
The office of the post-secondary commissioner shall promulgate regulations to enforce
compliance with this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005980
========
LC005980 - Page 2 of 3